District of Columbia statutes.
5-1501.09

Reexamination by independent experts.

The facilities, equipment, or supplies of the Department shall not be used by an independent expert employed by the accused or his or her attorney for any reexamination of materials previously examined by the Department.

Aug. 17, 2011, D.C. Law 19-18, § 10, 58 DCR 5403